Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF709.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 2562YH (1) 91 cm/jh H.F. 709 Section 1. Section 216.19, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended by striking the subsection. 2 EXPLANATION 3 The inclusion of this explanation does not constitute agreement with 4 the explanationâs substance by the members of the general assembly. 5 This bill removes the requirement that a city with a 6 population of 29,000 people or greater maintain an independent 7 local civil rights agency or commission. 8 -1- LSB 2562YH (1) 91 cm/jh 1/ 1